Washington statutes.
RCW 19.48.010

Definitions.

Any building held out to the public to be an inn, hotel or public lodging house or place where sleeping accommodations, whether with or without meals, or the facilities for preparing the same, are furnished for hire to transient guests, in which three or more rooms are used for the accommodation of such guests, shall for the purposes of this chapter and chapter 60.64 RCW, or any amendment thereof, only, be defined to be a hotel, and whenever the word hotel shall occur in this chapter and chapter 60.64 RCW, or any amendment thereof, it shall be construed to mean a hotel as herein described.

[ 1999 c 95 s 1; 1929 c 216 s 1; 1915 c 190 s 1; 1909 c 29 s 1; RRS s 6860. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1933 c 114 s 1, part; 1929 c 216 s 2, part; 1915 c 190 s 3, part; 1890 p 95 s 1, part; RRS s 6862, part, now codified in RCW 19.48.030.]

NOTES:

Guest defined: RCW 60.64.010.